Vermont, session 2025-2026, H837.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Nickel Rounding for Cash Transactions Act.”
Sec. 2. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to authorize the rounding of cash transactions to
the nearest five cents where one-cent coins are unavailable or impractical,
while ensuring legal clarity and consumer fairness.
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. chapter 1 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 1. MONEY OF ACCOUNT
§ 1. DOLLAR, CENT, AND MILL
The money of account in the State shall be the dollar, cent, and mill; and
accounts in public offices and proceedings in court shall be in conformity
VT LEG #386200 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.837
2026 Page 2 of 4
herewith; but this section shall not affect an account, charge, or entry originally
made or a contract expressed in other money of account, but the same shall be
reduced to dollars and parts of a dollar in an action thereon.
§ 2. NICKEL ROUNDING; AUTHORIZED
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Cash” means coins or paper currency of the United States offered in
physical form.
(2) “Cash transaction” means a sale of goods or services where payment
is made entirely or partially in cash.
(3) “Rounding” means adjusting the final total amount due, after taxes
and fees, to the nearest five-cent increment.
(b) Rounding authorization.
(1) A person or business engaged in a cash transaction may round the
final amount due to the nearest $0.05 as follows:
(A) If the final digit of the amount due is $0.01, $0.02, $0.06, or
$0.07, rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by five.
(B) If the final digit of the amount due is $0.03, $0.04, $0.08, or
$0.09, rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by five.
(2) If a person or business rounds a cash transaction under this section,
any cash refund of the amount paid shall be issued to the purchaser in the exact
amount initially paid for the goods or service.
VT LEG #386200 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.837
2026 Page 3 of 4
(c) Exclusions. This section shall not apply to:
(1) electronic and other noncash payments;
(2) payment of wages as that term is defined in 21 V.S.A. § 341;
(3) rebates or cash disbursements; and
(4) transactions governed by federal law that prohibits rounding.
(d) Application. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, rounding under
this section shall not constitute an unlawful price increase, surcharge, unfair or
deceptive act or practice in commerce, or discrimination.
(e) Optional use. This section shall not:
(1) prohibit a customer from tendering exact cash, including one-cent
coins, unless the person or business has provided notice that the person or
business rounds transactions in accordance with this section; or
(2) require a person or business to accept cash if the person or business
has posted a clear policy stating that the person or business does not accept
cash.
(f) Required notice. A person or business rounding transactions under this
section shall post a disclosure in clear and conspicuous terms at the point of
sale or on customer receipts.
(g) Taxes. All taxes shall be calculated and remitted based on the pre-
rounding amount.
VT LEG #386200 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.837
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386200 v.1